Massachusetts, session 194th, H2585.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The Massachusetts General Laws are hereby amended by inserting the
following new chapter:
A Chapter for Police Chief Reform, And Improvement.
All persons, in order to be qualified to be a Police Chief, shall have a distinct
Certification Process, that is distinct, from the Police Officer Certification Process.
There shall be a distinct Police Chief Standards and Accreditation Committee. This
Committee shall develop, and implement, such procedures.
SECTION 1A.) Membership of such committee, shall be determined by appropriate
consultation, and regulations, with the Executive Office of Public Safety and Security; the Office
of Governor, and the Attorney General. The Membership shall consist of no more than five (5)
of 3

individuals, who shall include at least one (1) individual with substantial experience, as a Police
Chief, and one (1) individual representing the general public.
SECTION 2. The Schedule for Police Chiefs, and those qualifying for such status, by a
distinct Police Chief Standards and Accreditation Committee, shall be:
• Temporary License (Time Limited to One Year)
• Provisional License (Time Limited to Two Years)
• Initial License (Time Limited to Three Years)
• Professional License (Time Limited to Five Years)
SECTION 3. The Balances, that must be evaluated, in the context of, the complexity of
Police Reform, include these needs:
• To recognize the raising of the level, and competence, of Police Officers.
• To distinctly raise the level of Police Chiefs, who have additional needs for
breadth of skill, training, competence, and management abilities.
• To provide a reasonable period for qualifying competent officers, who may wish
to seek appropriate promotion.
• To provide a reasonable period for qualifying additionally competent Police
Chiefs.
• To recognize appropriate values, in updating competent Police Chiefs, and their
honorable positions.
of 3

SECTION 4. In general, in recognizing the need for these long overdue reforms, actions
may, and likely should, reduce to the absolute possible minimum, the unfortunate prevalence of
various incompetencies; and remove such individuals as do not meet reasonable standards;
whether they be Police Officers, or Police Chiefs. In so doing, this legislation seeks to further
improve, the professional quality of Police Chiefs, and the appropriate respect that such
professionals should have, for such opportunity of enjoyment, in the communities, for which
they serve.
SECTION 4A.) Training Availabilities & Requirements. The process of regulation, and
standards, shall include recommendations, and standards for training availabilities, and
requirements, developed over time, and with a spirit of improving professional capabilities.
SECTION 5. While this may lead to the selected removal of some long-time Police
Officers, or Police Chiefs, the cost of any reform, must include the capacity, to move on, to a
new, fresh page of progress, without retaining significant flaws, that should not have been
permitted. This set of circumstances, can certainly be appropriately adjusted for, by appropriate
retirements, through existing provisions of Retirement Law.
of 3